District of Columbia statutes.
8-241.06

No private right of action against the District.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to, or does, create a private right of action against the government of the District of Columbia and its officers, employees, agents, representatives, contractors, successors, and assigns based upon compliance or noncompliance with its provisions. No person or entity may assert any claim or right as a beneficiary or protected class under this chapter in any civil, criminal, or administrative action against the District of Columbia.

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 307, 61 DCR 6767

History